Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3595.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CANCELLATION; PASSENGER RAIL PROJECT.new text end new text begin $117,000,000 of the appropriation in Laws 2023, chapter 68, article 1, section 2, subdivision 2, paragraph (d), for capital improvements and betterments for the Minneapolis-Duluth Northern Lights Express intercity passenger rail project is canceled on the effective date of this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin U.S. HIGHWAY 169 EXPANSION; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $117,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of transportation for predesign; design; engineering; environmental analysis and remediation; property acquisition, including easements; and construction of an expansion of marked U.S. Highway 169 from a two-lane to a four-lane divided highway between Taconite and Pengilly. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2029. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end